District of Columbia statutes.
9-1111.08

Authorization of appropriations.

(a)

There are authorized to be appropriated to the Secretary of Transportation such amounts as may be necessary to enable him to discharge his responsibilities under guarantees issued by him under § 9-1111.06 and to make the payments to the Transit Authority in accordance with § 9-1111.12. Amounts appropriated under this section shall be available without fiscal year limitation.

(b)

If at any time the moneys available to the Secretary of Transportation are insufficient to enable him to discharge his responsibilities under guarantees issued by him under § 9-1111.06 or to make payments to the Transit Authority in accordance with § 9-1111.12, he shall issue to the Secretary of the Treasury notes or other obligations in such forms and denominations, bearing such maturities, and subject to such terms and conditions, as may be prescribed by the Secretary of the Treasury. Redemption of such notes or obligations shall be made by the Secretary of Transportation from appropriations available under subsection (a) of this section. Such notes or other obligations shall bear interest at a rate determined by the Secretary of the Treasury, taking into consideration the current average market yield on outstanding marketable obligations of the United States of comparable maturities during the month preceding the issuance of the notes or other obligations. The Secretary of the Treasury shall purchase any notes or other obligations issued hereunder and for that purpose he is authorized to use as a public debt transaction the proceeds from the sale of any securities issued under the Second Liberty Bond Act and the purposes for which securities may be issued under that Act are extended to include any purchase of such notes or obligations. The Secretary of the Treasury may at any time sell any of the notes or other obligations acquired by him under this subsection. All redemptions, purchases, and sales by the Secretary of the Treasury of such notes or other obligations shall be treated as public debt transactions of the United States.

Dec. 9, 1969, Pub. L. 91-143, § 11
July 13, 1972, 86 Stat. 465, Pub. L. 92-349, title I, § 101
Jan. 3, 1980, 93 Stat. 1323, Pub. L. 96-184, § 3(d)
1981 Ed., § 1-2460.
1973 Ed., § 1-1448.
For temporary (225 day) amendment of §§ 7062 and 7063 of D.C. Law 15-205, see § 2 of Metro Bus Funding Requirement Temporary Amendment Act of 2006 (D.C. Law 16-196, March 2, 2007, law notification 54 DCR 2494).
For temporary (90 day) Metrorail and Metro Bus provisions, see §§ 7022 to 7062 of Fiscal Year 2005 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2004 (D.C. Act 15-486, August 2, 2004, 51 DCR 8236).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of D.C. Law 15-205, §§ 7062, 7063, see § 2 of Metro Bus Funding Requirement Emergency Amendment Act of 2006 (D.C. Act 16-448, July 21, 2006, 53 DCR 6489).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of D.C. Law 15-205, §§ 7062, 7063, see § 2 of Metro Bus Funding Requirement Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2006 (D.C. Act 16-519, October 27, 2006, 53 DCR 9113).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of D.C. Law 15-205, §§ 7062 and 7063, see § 2 of Metro Bus Funding Requirements Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2007 (D.C. Act 17-4, January 16, 2007, 54 DCR 1445).

Short title of subtitle C of Law 15-205: Section 7021 of D.C. Law 15-205 provided that subtitle C of the act may be cited as the Metrorail Late-Night Funding Requirement Act of 2004.

Short title of subtitle D of Law 15-205: Section 7031 of D.C. Law 15-205 provided that subtitle D of the act may be cited as the Downtown Circulator Bus Service Funding Act of 2004.

Short title of subtitle E of Law 15-205: Section 7041 of D.C. Law 15-205 provided that subtitle E of the act may be cited as the Cardozo Pre-Apprenticeship Program Act of 2004.

Short title of subtitle F of Law 15-205: Section 7051 of D.C. Law 15-205 provided that subtitle F of the act may be cited as the Tourists Take Metro to DC Neighborhoods Act of 2004.

Short title of subtitle G of Law 15-205: Section 7061 of D.C. Law 15-205 provided that subtitle G of the act may be cited as the Metro Bus Funding Requirement Act of 2004.

“The Second Liberty Bond Act,” referred to in the fourth sentence of subsection (b) of this section, is the Act of September 24, 1917, 40 Stat. 288, ch. 56.

Metrorail Funding: Section 7022 of D.C. Law 15-205 provided:

“(a) The Council authorizes the use of $486,000 from any WMATA fare increase implemented after April 30, 2004, to be made available to meet the District’s contribution to funding the cost of operating the Metro system from 2:00 a.m. to 3:00 a.m. on Saturday and Sunday mornings, beginning January 1, 2005.

“(b) No District funds shall be made available for the service described in subsection (a) of this section unless the service is made a regional service and is funded pursuant to the Metrorail Subsidy Allocation Formula.”

Downtown Circulator Bus Service: Section 7032 of D.C. Law 15-205 provided: “The Council authorizes the use of $200,000 from any WMATA fare increase implemented after April 30, 2004, to be made available for the Downtown Circulator Bus Service, which amount shall be in addition to the $500,000 appropriated in the District of Columbia Appropriations Act, 2005.”

Cardozo Pre-Apprenticeship Program: Section 7042 of D.C. Law 15-205 provided: “The Council directs the Washington Metropolitan Area Transit Authority (‘WMATA’) to use $213,925 from any WMATA fare increase implemented after April 30, 2004, to fund the Electro-Mechanical Technology Training Program for the District of Columbia high school students at Cardozo Senior High School’s Transportation and Technology program.”

Tourists Take Metro to DC Neighborhoods: Section 7052 of D.C. Law 15-205 provided: “The Council authorizes the Washington Metropolitan Area Transit Authority to make $30,000 of the District’s subsidy appropriated in the District of Columbia Appropriations Act, 2005 available to Cultural Tourism DC for the continuation of a program encouraging tourists to use Metro to go beyond the monuments into the neighborhoods.”

Metro Bus Funding: Sections 7062 and 7063 of D.C. Law 15-205 provided:

“It is the position of the District government that the Washington Metropolitan Area Transit Authority shall not procure any diesel buses or diesel-electric hybrid buses, with the exception of the Downtown Circulator Bus Service.

“Beginning with fiscal year 2006, the Mayor shall not submit a budget for the Washington Metropolitan Area Transit Authority to the Council of the District of Columbia that funds diesel or diesel-electric hybrid buses, except for the Downtown Circulator Bus Service.”